test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verb-klasse6_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - gurkedh: # verb 5, stem -e, root vowel e-
    gurkedh+V+TV+Inf: gurkedh
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gurkem
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gurkh
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: gurkie
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: gurkien
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [gurkeden, gurkijidien]
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: gurkijægan
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [gurkebe, gurkijibie]
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [gurkede, gurkijidie]
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: gurkieh
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: gurkim
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: gurkih
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: gurki
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: gurkimen
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: gurkiden
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: gurkigan
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: gurkimh
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: gurkidh
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: gurkin
    gurkedh+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: gurkh
    gurkedh+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: [gurkeden, gurkijidien]
    gurkedh+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [gurkede, gurkijidie] 
    gurkedh+V+TV+ConNeg: gurkh
    gurkedh+V+TV+Ger: gurkeminie
    gurkedh+V+TV+PrfPrc: gurkeme
    gurkedh+V+TV+VGen: gurken 


# test for rotvokal -öö 

  Verb - bööredh: # verb 6, stem -öö, root vowel e-
    bööredh+V+TV+Inf: bööredh
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: böörem
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: böörh
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: böörie
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: böörien
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [bööreden, böörijidien]
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: böörijægan
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [böörebe, böörijibie]
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [böörede, böörijidie]
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: böörieh
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: böörim
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: böörih
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: bööri
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: böörimen
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: bööriden
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: böörigan
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: böörimh
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: bööridh
    bööredh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: böörin
    bööredh+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: böörh
    bööredh+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: [bööreden, böörijidien]
    bööredh+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [böörede, böörijidie] 
    bööredh+V+TV+ConNeg: böörh
    bööredh+V+TV+Ger: bööreminie
    bööredh+V+TV+PrfPrc: bööreme
    bööredh+V+TV+VGen: böören 



  Verb - deemedh: # verb 6, stem -ee, root vowel e-
    deemedh+V+TV+Inf: deemedh
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: deemem
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: deemh
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: deemie
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: deemien
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [deemeden, deemijidien]
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: deemijægan
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [deemebe, deemijibie]
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [deemede, deemijidie]
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: deemieh
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: deemim
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: deemih
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: deemi
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: deemimen
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: deemiden
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: deemigan
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: deemimh
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: deemidh
    deemedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: deemin
    deemedh+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: deemh
    deemedh+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: [deemeden, deemijidien]
    deemedh+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [deemede, deemijidie] 
    deemedh+V+TV+ConNeg: deemh
    deemedh+V+TV+Ger: deememinie
    deemedh+V+TV+PrfPrc: deememe
    deemedh+V+TV+VGen: deemen 



  Verb - dijpedh: # verb 6, stem -i, root vowel e-
    dijpedh+V+TV+Inf: dijpedh
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: dijpem
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: dijph
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: dijpie
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: dijpien
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [dijpeden, dijpijidien]
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: dijpijægan
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [dijpebe, dijpijibie]
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [dijpede, dijpijidie]
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: dijpieh
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: dijpim
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: dijpih
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dijpi
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: dijpimen
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: dijpiden
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: dijpigan
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: dijpimh
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: dijpidh
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: dijpin
    dijpedh+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: dijph
    dijpedh+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: [dijpeden, dijpijidien]
    dijpedh+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [dijpede, dijpijidie] 
    dijpedh+V+TV+ConNeg: dijph
    dijpedh+V+TV+Ger: dijpeminie
    dijpedh+V+TV+PrfPrc: dijpeme
    dijpedh+V+TV+VGen: dijpen 



  
